Hawaii statutes.
§466-5.5 Educational requirements for
licensure effective December 31, 2000. Effective December 31, 2000, an
applicant for licensure shall have at least one-hundred-fifty semester hours of
college education. Within the one-hundred-fifty semester hours, the applicant
shall have:

(1) A baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a
college or university acceptable to the board; and

(2) An accounting concentration or its equivalent as
specified in the rules of the board;

except that applicants for licensure who have
successfully completed the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination
before December 31, 2000, or held conditional credit before December 31, 2000,
and subsequently completed the examination before the conditional credit
expired, may continue to meet the educational requirements of section 466-5(b).
[L 1997, c 35, §1; am L 2002, c 135, §1]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next